Utah statutes.
76-10-1006.   Selling or dealing with articles bearing registered trademark
or service mark with intent to defraud.
Every person who, without the consent of the owner of an article bearing the
owner's validly registered trademark or service mark, knowingly sells or
traffics in the articles or who withholds the articles from the owner thereof
with intent to defraud the owner thereof is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
